Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,130
Investments in savings accounts in name of fiduciary; open account; withdrawal; death of fiduciary; effect.

Any bank, building and loan association, or savings and loan association may accept investments in savings accounts or shares in the name of any administrator, personal representative, custodian, conservator, guardian, trustee, or other fiduciary for a named beneficiary or beneficiaries. Any such fiduciary shall have the power to open, make additions to, and withdraw any such account, in whole or in part, or to purchase such shares, purchase additional shares, or sell all or any part of such shares, and any such fiduciary who is the owner of shares shall have power to vote as a member as if the membership were held absolutely. The withdrawal value of any such account or shares, and earnings thereon, or other rights relating thereto may be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to such fiduciary without regard to any notice to the contrary as long as such fiduciary is living. The payment or delivery to any such fiduciary or a receipt or acquittance signed by any such fiduciary to whom any such payment or any such delivery of right is made shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the bank or association for the payment or delivery so made. Whenever a person holding an account or shares in a fiduciary capacity dies and no written notice of the revocation or termination of the fiduciary relationship has been given to the bank or association and the bank or association has no written notice of any other disposition of the beneficial estate, the withdrawal value of such account or shares, and earnings thereon, or other rights relating thereto may, at the option of the bank or association, be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to the beneficiary or beneficiaries. Whenever an account or share shall be designated by any person describing himself or herself in opening such account or acquiring such share as trustee for another and no other or further notice of the existence and terms of a legal and valid trust than such description has been given in writing to the bank or association, or whenever an account is opened or shares are acquired specifically designated as a trust account or share held in trust and which contains a trust agreement as a part thereof, in the event of the death of the person so described as trustee, the withdrawal value of such account or shares or any part thereof, together with the earnings thereon, may be paid to the person for whom the account or shares are so described. The payment or delivery to any such beneficiary, beneficiaries, or designated person or a receipt or acquittance signed by any such beneficiary, beneficiaries, or designated person for any such payment or delivery shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the bank or association for the payment or delivery so made. No bank or association paying any such fiduciary, beneficiary, or designated person in accordance with this section shall thereby be liable for any estate, inheritance, or succession taxes which may be due this state.

Laws 1974, LB 912, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 909, § 2.